en: Protected item type: Credit & ATM Card; Driver's License; ID Badge; Key Fob; Passport; Smartphone; Universal; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de item protegido: Cartão de crédito e cartão multibanco; Carta de condução; Crachá de identificação; Chaveiro; Passaporte; Smartphone; Universal; Outro
nb: Type element som beskyttes: Kreditt- og minibankkort; Førerkort; ID-kort; Nøkkelbrikke; Pass; Smarttelefon; Universal; Annet
nl: Beschermd type artikel: Betaalpas en creditcard; Rijbewijs; ID-badge; Sleutelhanger; Paspoort; Smartphone; Universeel; Overig
ja: 保護されたアイテムの種類: クレジットカードとATMカード; 運転免許証; IDバッジ; キーフォブ; パスポート; スマートフォン; ユニバーサル; その他
hr-HR: Vrsta zaštićenog proizvoda: Kreditna i bankovna kartica; Vozačka dozvola; identifikacijska značka; Privjesak za ključeve; Putovnica; Pametni telefon; Univerzalno; Ostalo
bg-BG: Защитен тип артикул: Кредитна и дебитна карта; Шофьорска книжка; Идентификационна карта; Ключодържател; Паспорт; Смартфон; Универсално; Друго
ru: Тип защищаемого предмета: Кредитная и банковская карта; Водительское удостоверение; Бейдж; Брелок; Паспорт; Смартфон; Универсальный; Другое
th: ประเภทสิ่งของที่ได้รับการปกป้อง: บัตรเครดิตและบัตรเอทีเอ็ม; ใบขับขี่; บัตรประจำตัว; กุญแจรีโมท; หนังสือเดินทาง; สมาร์ทโฟน; สากล; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ chráněného předmětu: Platební karta; Řidičský průkaz; Identifikační karta; Klíčenka; Pas; Smartphone; Univerzální; Jiné
sl-SI: Vrsta zaščitenega elementa: Kreditna in bančna kartica; Vozniško dovoljenje; Identifikacijska značka; Obesek za ključe; Potni list; Pametni telefon; Univerzalno; Druga
lt-LT: Apsaugotas daiktų tipas: Kredito ir bankomatų kortelė; Vairuotojo pažymėjimas; ID ženklelis; Raktų pakabukas; Pasas; Išmanusis telefonas; Universalus; Kita
sk-SK: Typ chránenej položky: Kreditná a bankomatová karta; Vodičský preukaz; Identifikačná karta; Elektronický kľúč; Pas; Smartfón; Univerzálna; Iné
vi: Loại vật dụng được bảo vệ: Thẻ tín dụng & thẻ ATM; Giấy phép lái xe; Huy hiệu ID; Chìa khóa thông minh; Hộ chiếu; Điện thoại thông minh; Phổ quát; Khác
sv: Skyddad artikeltyp: Kredit- och bankkort; Körkort; ID-bricka; Nyckelbricka; Pass; Smartphone; Universell; Övrigt
pt-BR: Tipo de item protegido: Cartão de crédito e débito; Carteira de motorista; Crachá de identificação; Chave eletrônica; Passaporte; Smartphone; Universal; Outro
ro-RO: Tip de obiect protejat: Card de credit și bancomat; Permis de conducere; Ecuson de identificare; Breloc cheie; Pașaport; Smartphone; Universal; Altele
tr: Korunan ürün türü: Kredi ve ATM kartı; Ehliyet; Kimlik kartı; Anahtarlık; Pasaport; Akıllı telefon; Evrensel; Diğer
el: Τύπος προστατευόμενου αντικειμένου: Πιστωτικό ποσό & κάρτα ATM; Άδεια οδήγησης; Αναγνωριστικό σήμα; Μπρελόκ; Διαβατήριο; Smartphone; Universal; Άλλο
hu: Védett tétel típusa: Hitel- és bankkártya; Jogosítvány; Azonosítókártya; Kulcstartó; Útlevél; Okostelefon; Általános; Egyéb
zh-TW: 受保護物品類型: 信用卡與提款卡; 駕照; ID 識別證; 遙控鑰匙; 護照; 智慧型手機; 通用; 其他
ko: 보호 대상 품목 유형: 신용카드 및 현금카드; 운전면허증; 신분증; 키푑; 여권; 스마트폰; 범용; 기타
zh-CN: 保护商品类型: 信用卡和银行卡; 驾照; 身份徽章; 钥匙扣; 护照; 智能手机; 通用; 其他
da: Beskyttet varetype: Kredit- og hævekort; Kørekort; ID-kort; Nøglevedhæng; Pas; Smartphone; Universal; Andet
pl: Typ chronionego produktu: Karta kredytowa / bankomatowa; Prawo jazdy; Identyfikator; Brelok do kluczy; Paszport; Smartfon; Uniwersalne; Inne
it: Tipo di articolo protetto: Carta di credito e bancomat; Patente di guida; distintivo ID; Portachiavi; Passaporto; Smartphone; Universale; Altro
es: Tipo de artículo protegido: Tarjeta de crédito y cajero automático; Licencia de conducir; Credencial de identificación; Llavero; Pasaporte; Teléfono inteligente; Universal; Otros
fi: Suojattu tuotetyyppi: Luotto- ja pankkiautomaattikortit; Ajokortti; Tunnusmerkki; Avaimenperä; Passi; Älypuhelin; Yleinen; Muu
fr: Type d’article protégé: Carte de crédit et carte de retrait; Permis de conduire; Badge ID; Porte-clés électronique; Passeport; Smartphone; Universel; Autre
de: Typ des geschützten Artikels: Kredit- und Girokarte; Führerschein; Identitätsnachweis; Schlüsselanhänger; Reisepass; Smartphone; Universell; Sonstiges